Georgia, session 2025_26, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding prosecuting attorneys, is amended by revising Code
Section 15-18-3, relating to qualifications for district attorneys, as follows:
"15-18-3.
(a) To be eligible to fill the office of district attorney, a person must:
(1) Have been a resident citizen of this state three years just preceding his or her election
or appointment;
(2) Permanently reside in the circuit at the time of his or her election or appointment;
S. B. 3
- 1 -

LC 28 0653
(3) Have attained the age of 25 years;
(4) Have been duly admitted and licensed to practice law in the superior courts for at
least three years; and
(5) If previously disbarred from the practice of law, have been reinstated as provided by
law.
(b) Any person who solicits, accepts, or refuses to reject a pardon for any crime under the
laws of this state, any other state, or the United States shall not be eligible for election or
appointment to the office of district attorney nor to serve as a district attorney."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising subsection (b) of Code Section 15-18-21, relating
to qualifications of attorneys and investigators employed by district attorney, as follows:
"(b)(1) Any assistant district attorney, deputy district attorney, or any other attorney at
law employed by the district attorney shall:
(A) Be be a member of the State Bar of Georgia,;
(B) Be admitted admitted to practice before the appellate courts of this state,;
(C) Serve shall serve at the pleasure of the district attorney;, and
(D) Have shall have such authority, powers, and duties as may be assigned by the
district attorney; and
(E) Not have been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, any other state,
or the United States nor solicited, accepted, or refused to reject a pardon for a felony
under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States.
(2) An assistant district attorney, deputy district attorney, or any other attorney at law
employed by a district attorney shall immediately vacate his or her position upon initial
conviction of a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States
S. B. 3
- 2 -

LC 28 0653
or upon soliciting, accepting, or refusing to reject a pardon for a felony under the laws of
this state, any other state, or the United States."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 3
- 3 -